California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(c) Violating or attempting to violate,
 directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting the violating of, or conspiring to violate any provision or term of this chapter.

(d) Making or giving any false statement or information in connection with the application for issuance of a license.

(e) Conviction of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of a licensed vocational nurse, in which event the record of the conviction shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction.

(f) Impersonating any applicant or acting as proxy for an applicant in any examination required under this chapter for the issuance of a license.

(g) Impersonating another practitioner, misrepresenting professional
 credentials or licensure status, or permitting another person to use the licensee’s certificate or license.

(h) Aiding or assisting, or agreeing to aid or assist any person or persons, whether a licensed physician or not, in the performance of or arranging for a violation of Article 12 (commencing with Section 2220) of Chapter 5.

(i) The commission of any act involving dishonesty, when that action is related to the duties and functions of the licensee.

(j) The commission of any act punishable as a sexually related crime, if that act is substantially related to the duties and functions of the licensee.

(k) Except for good cause, the knowing failure to protect patients
 by failing to follow infection control guidelines of the board, thereby risking transmission of blood-borne infectious diseases from licensee to patient, from patient to patient, and from patient to licensee. In administering this subdivision, the board shall consider referencing the standards, regulations, and guidelines of the State Department of Public Health developed pursuant to Section 1250.11 of the Health and Safety Code and the standards, guidelines, and regulations pursuant to the California Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1973 (Part 1 (commencing with Section 6300) of Division 5 of the Labor Code) for preventing the transmission of HIV, hepatitis B, and other blood-borne pathogens in health care settings. As necessary, the board shall consult with the Medical Board of California, the Podiatric Medical Board of California, the Board of Dental Examiners, and the Board of Registered
 Nursing, to encourage appropriate consistency in the implementation of this subdivision.

(l) The board shall seek to ensure that licentiates and others regulated by the board are informed of the responsibility of licentiates and others to follow infection control guidelines, and of the most recent scientifically recognized safeguards for minimizing the risk of transmission of blood-borne infectious diseases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 136, Sec. 7.   (AB 260)   Effective September 26, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2878.1.

(a) If a licensed vocational nurse has knowledge that another person has committed any act prohibited by Section 2878, the licensed vocational nurse shall report this information to the board in writing and shall cooperate with the board in furnishing information or assistance as may be required.

(b) Any employer of a licensed vocational nurse shall report to the board the suspension or termination for cause, or resignation for cause, of any licensed vocational nurse in its employ. In the case of licensed vocational nurses employed by the state, the report shall not be made until after the conclusion of the review process specified in Section 52.6 of Title 2 of the California Code of Regulations and Skelly v. State Personnel Bd. (1975) 15 Cal.3d 194. This required
 reporting shall not constitute a waiver of confidentiality of medical records. The information reported or disclosed shall be kept confidential except as provided in subdivision (d) and shall not be subject to discovery in civil cases.

(c) An employment agency or nursing registry shall report to the board the rejection from assignment of a licensed vocational nurse by a health facility or home health care provider due to acts that would be cause for suspension or termination as described in subdivision (d).

(d) For purposes of this section, “suspension, termination, or resignation for cause” or “rejection from assignment” are defined as suspension, termination, or resignation from employment, or rejection from assignment, for any of the following reasons:

(1) Use of controlled substances or alcohol to the extent that
 it impairs the licensee’s ability to safely practice vocational nursing.

(2) Unlawful sale of a controlled substance or other prescription items.

(3) Patient or client abuse, neglect, physical harm, or sexual contact with a patient or client.

(4) Falsification of medical records.

(5) Gross negligence or incompetence.

(6) Theft from patients or clients, other employees, or the employer.

(e) Failure of an employer to make a report required by this section is punishable by an administrative fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation.

(f) Pursuant to Section 43.8 of the Civil Code, no person shall incur any civil penalty as a result of making any report required by this chapter.

(g) The board shall implement this section contingent upon the necessary funding in the annual Budget Act.

(h) For purposes of this section, “employer” includes employment agencies and nursing registries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 632, Sec. 23.   (AB 1536)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2878.2.

The board shall share all complaints and information related to investigations involving respiratory care services, as described in Chapter 8.3 (commencing with Section 3700), including, but not limited to, data, findings, interviews, and evidence, with the Respiratory Care Board of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 624, Sec. 2.   (SB 1436)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2878.5.

In addition to other acts constituting unprofessional conduct within the meaning of this chapter, it is unprofessional conduct for a person licensed under this chapter to do any of the following:

(a) Obtain or possess in violation of law, or prescribe, or except as directed by a licensed physician and surgeon, dentist or podiatrist administer to the licensee or furnish or administer to another, any controlled substance as defined in Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code, or any dangerous drug as defined in Section 4022.

(b) Use any controlled substance as defined in Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code, or any
 dangerous drug as defined in Section 4022, or alcoholic beverages, to an extent or in a manner dangerous or injurious to the licensee, any other person, or the public, or to the extent that the use impairs the licensee’s ability to conduct with safety to the public the practice authorized by their license.

(c) Be convicted of a criminal offense involving possession of any narcotic or dangerous drug, or the prescription, consumption, or self-administration of any of the substances described in subdivisions (a) and (b) of this section, in which event the record of the conviction is conclusive evidence thereof.

(d) Be committed or confined by a court of competent jurisdiction for intemperate use of or addiction to the use of any of the substances described in subdivisions (a) and (b) of this section, in which event the court order of commitment or confinement is prima facie evidence
 of that commitment or confinement.

(e) Falsify, or make grossly incorrect, grossly inconsistent, or unintelligible entries in any hospital, patient, or other record pertaining to narcotics or dangerous drugs as specified in subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 632, Sec. 24.   (AB 1536)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2878.6.

A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere made to a charge substantially related to the qualifications, functions and duties of a licensed vocational nurse is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this article. The board may order the license suspended or revoked, or may decline to issue a license, when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing such person to withdraw his plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information or indictment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

2878.7.

(a) A person whose license has been revoked, suspended, surrendered, or placed on probation, may petition the board for reinstatement or modification of the penalty, including modification or termination of probation, after a period not less than the following minimum periods has elapsed from the effective date of the disciplinary order or if any portion of the order is stayed by the board itself or by the superior court, from the date the disciplinary action is actually implemented in its entirety:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, at least three years for the reinstatement of a license that was revoked or surrendered, except that the board may, in its sole discretion, specify in its order a lesser period of
 time, which shall be no less than one year, to petition for reinstatement.

(2) At least two years for the early termination of a probation period of three years or more.

(3) At least one year for the early termination of a probation period of less than three years.

(4) At least one year for the modification of a condition of probation, or for the reinstatement of a license revoked for mental or physical illness.

(b) The board shall give notice to the Attorney General of the filing of the petition. The petitioner and the Attorney General shall be given timely notice by letter of the time and place of the hearing on the petition, and an opportunity to present both oral and documentary evidence and argument to the board. The petitioner shall at all times
 have the burden of proof to establish by clear and convincing evidence that the petitioner is entitled to the relief sought in the petition.

(c) The board itself or the administrative law judge, if one is designated by the board, shall hear the petition and shall prepare a written decision setting forth the reasons supporting the decision.

(d) The board may grant or deny the petition or may impose any terms and conditions that it reasonably deems appropriate as a condition of reinstatement or reduction of penalty.

(e) No petition shall be considered while the petitioner is under sentence for any criminal offense, including any period during which the petitioner is on court-imposed probation or parole or subject to an order of registration pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code. No petition shall be considered
 while there is an accusation or petition to revoke probation pending against the petitioner.

(f) Except in those cases where the petitioner has been disciplined for a violation of Section 822, the board may in its discretion deny without hearing or argument any petition that is filed pursuant to this section within a period of two years from the effective date of a prior decision following a hearing under this section.

(g) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to alter the provisions of Sections 822 and 823.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 632, Sec. 25.   (AB 1536)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2878.8.

The board may deny any application or may suspend or revoke any license issued under this chapter based upon the denial of licensure, suspension, restriction, or other disciplinary action of a license by another state, any other government agency, or by another California health care professional licensing board. A certified copy of the finding shall be conclusive evidence of that action provided that, if from another state, the findings establish an act which if committed in California would be grounds for discipline.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1289, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

2878.9.

(a) The board may issue an initial license on probation, with specific terms and conditions, to any applicant who has violated any term of this chapter, but who has met all other requirements for licensure and who has successfully completed the examination for licensure within four years of the date of issuance of the initial license.

(b) Specific terms and conditions may include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Continuing medical, psychiatric, or psychological treatment.

(2) Ongoing participation in a specified rehabilitation program.

(3) Abstention from the use of alcohol or drugs.

(4) Compliance with all provisions of this chapter.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and for purposes of this section, when deciding whether to issue a probationary license, the board shall request that an applicant with a dismissed conviction provide proof of that dismissal and shall give special consideration to applicants whose convictions have been dismissed pursuant to Section 1203.4 or 1203.4a of the Penal Code.

(2) The board shall also take into account and consider any other reasonable documents or individual character references provided by the applicant that may serve as evidence of rehabilitation as deemed appropriate by the board.

(d) The board may modify or terminate the terms and conditions imposed on the probationary license upon receipt of a petition from the applicant or licensee.

(e) For purposes of issuing a probationary license to qualified new applicants, the board shall develop standard terms of probation that shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) A three-year limit on the individual probationary license.

(2) A process to obtain a standard license for applicants who were issued a probationary license.

(3) Supervision requirements.

(4) Compliance and quarterly reporting requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2879.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 2878 or any other law, the board may revoke, suspend, or deny at any time a license under this chapter on any of the grounds for disciplinary action provided in this chapter. The proceedings under this section shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the board shall have all the powers granted therein.

(b) The board may deny a license to an applicant on any of the grounds specified in Section 480.

(c) In addition to the requirements provided in Sections 485 and 486, upon denial of an application for a license, the board shall provide a
 statement of reasons for the denial that does the following:

(1) Evaluates evidence of rehabilitation submitted by the applicant, if any.

(2) Provides the board’s criteria relating to rehabilitation, formulated pursuant to Section 482, that takes into account the age and severity of the offense, and the evidence relating to participation in treatment or other rehabilitation programs.

(3) If the board’s decision was based on the applicant’s prior criminal conviction, justifies the board’s denial of a license and conveys the reasons why the prior criminal conviction is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a licensed vocational nurse.

(d) Commencing July 1, 2009, all of the following shall apply:

(1) If the denial of a license is due at least in part to the applicant’s state or federal criminal history record, the board shall, in addition to the information provided pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), provide to the applicant a copy of the applicant’s criminal history record if the applicant makes a written request to the board for a copy, specifying an address to which it is to be sent.

(A) The state or federal criminal history record shall not be modified or altered from its form or content as provided by the Department of Justice.

(B) The criminal history record shall be provided in such a manner as to protect the confidentiality and privacy of the applicant’s criminal history record and the criminal history record shall not be made available by the board to any employer.

(C) The board shall retain a copy of the applicant’s written request and a copy of the response sent to the applicant, which shall include the date and the address to which the response was sent.

(2) The board shall make this information available upon request by the Department of Justice or the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 487, the board shall conduct a hearing of a license denial within 90 days of receiving an applicant’s request for a hearing. For all other hearing requests, the board shall determine when the hearing shall be conducted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 632, Sec. 26.   (AB 1536)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Vocational Nursing Schools [2880. - 2884.]

2880.

The board shall prepare and maintain a list of approved schools of vocational nursing in this state whose graduates, if they have the other necessary qualifications provided in this chapter, shall be eligible to apply for a license to practice vocational nursing in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 338, Sec. 10.   (SB 539)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2881.

An approved school of vocational nursing is one which has been approved by the Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians of the State of California, gives a course of instruction in vocational nursing of not less than 1,530 hours or 50 semester units approved by the board pursuant to Section 2882 whether the same be established by the State Board of Education, other educational institutions, or other public or private agencies or institutions and is affiliated or conducted in connection with one or more hospitals.

One hour of instruction for purposes of computing the total hours of instruction or for
 calculating semester units as specified in this section shall consist of not less than 50 minutes of actual class time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 338, Sec. 11.   (SB 539)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2881.1.

The board shall deny the application for approval made by, and shall revoke the approval given to, any school of vocational nursing that does not give to student applicants credit, in the field of nursing, for previous education and the opportunity to obtain credit for other acquired knowledge by the use of challenge examinations or other methods of evaluation.

The board shall prescribe, by regulation, the education for which credit is to be given and the amount of credit that is to be given for each type of education, including the amount of credit to be given to a certified nurse assistant, a nurse assistant who has provided direct nursing services in health facilities, and an applicant who has successfully completed
 equivalent courses offered by a secondary school that is approved by the State Department of Education in any state or by a nationally recognized regional accrediting body. These courses shall be assessed for equivalency by the vocational nursing school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 338, Sec. 12.   (SB 539)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2881.2.

(a) The approval process for a school or program shall be consistent with the following timelines:

(1) (A) Upon receipt of a complete letter of intent to submit an application for approval as a school or program of licensed vocational nursing, the board shall notify the proposed school or program of the steps in the approval process and provide an estimated wait time until active assignment to a nursing education consultant.

(B) A vocational nursing school or program that fails to submit a complete letter of intent within 30 days from the date the board notifies the school or program of deficiencies shall be taken out of consideration for approval as a new school or program and
 may only reapply after six months. 

(C) Upon active assignment of a nursing education consultant, the school or program shall submit an initial application for approval within 60 days.

(2) (A) Within 30 days of the date the board receives an initial application for approval, the board shall notify the school or program whether the application is complete.

(B) A notice that an initial application is not complete shall specify what additional documents or payment of fees the school or program is required to submit to the board to make the application complete.

(3) Within 60 days from the date the board notifies the school or program that the initial application is not complete, the school or program shall provide the missing
 information. If a school or program fails to submit the required information, the board shall take the application out of consideration consistent with subdivision (c) of Section 2881.3.

(4) Within six months of the date the board receives an initial application for approval as a school or program, the board shall approve the school or program, deny approval, or notify the school or program that corrective action is required.

(b) A school or program of vocational nursing seeking approval by the board shall remit to the board for deposit in the Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians Fund fees in accordance with the following schedule:

(1) The nonrefundable initial application fee shall be in an amount equal to the reasonable costs incurred by the board in reviewing and processing the application up to five
 thousand dollars ($5,000).

(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), the final approval fee shall be in an amount equal to the reasonable costs incurred by the board in the application approval process up to fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000).

(B) The final approval fee for an applicant program that meets both of the following criteria shall be in an amount equal to the reasonable costs incurred by the board in the application approval process up to five thousand dollars ($5,000):

(i) The program is affiliated with an approved school or program that is in good standing.

(ii) The program utilizes the curriculum and policies approved by the board for the approved school or program.

(3) The continuing approval fee shall be in an amount equal to the reasonable costs incurred by the board in providing oversight and review of a school or program up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) once every four years.

(c) If the board makes an initial determination that the cost of providing oversight and review of a school or program under this section is less than the amount of any fees required to be paid by that school or program, the board shall decrease the fees applicable to that institution to an amount that is proportional to the board’s reasonable costs associated with that school or program.

(d) The board may reduce the continuing approval fees, by no more than one-half of the established fee, for a program that experiences a reduction in enrollment capacity that directly leads to a reduction in state
 funding. The board shall require a program to provide documentation for the purposes of issuing the fee reduction.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 590, Sec. 4.   (AB 3255)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2881.3.

(a) The board shall maintain a list of inactive vocational nursing schools and programs seeking board approval.

(b) A vocational nursing school or program seeking board approval shall respond to the board within two weeks of each inquiry or request during all phases of the application process after the school or program has submitted an initial application for approval pursuant to Section 2881.2. A school or program that does not respond within two weeks, fails to submit documentation required by the board in time, or fails to pay the required fees, shall be designated as inactive.

(c) A vocational nursing school or program seeking board approval that has been on the inactive list for 90 days over the
 course of the application period shall be taken out of consideration for a new school or program and may only reapply after six months.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 590, Sec. 5.   (AB 3255)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2882.

The course of instruction of an approved school of vocational nursing shall consist of not less than the required number of hours of instruction in such subjects as the board may from time to time by regulation determine, together with the required number of hours in the care of medical, surgical, obstetrical patients, sick children, and such other clinical experience as from time to time may be determined by the board.

The board shall, by regulation, provide for the approval of courses of instruction expressed in hours of instruction, or academic units, or which require satisfactory demonstration of skills and behavioral competencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 338, Sec. 13.   (SB 539)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2883.

(a) It shall be the duty of the board, through an official representative, to inspect or review all vocational nursing schools or programs in this state at such times as the board shall deem necessary. Written reports of the inspection or review shall be made to the board, which shall thereupon approve the schools or programs that meet the requirements provided by the board.

(b) (1) Upon receiving the report of the representative, if the board determines that any vocational nursing school or program is not maintaining the standard required by the board, notice thereof in writing specifying the defect or defects shall be immediately given to the school or program. If the defects are not corrected within a reasonable time, the school or program
 may be issued a citation and assessed a fine as specified under subdivision (c) or removed from the approved list and notice thereof in writing given to it.

(2) Until the board establishes regulations pursuant to subdivision (c), a school or program may only be removed from the approved list if defects are not corrected within a reasonable time.

(c) (1) The board may issue a citation, which may contain an order of abatement or an order to pay an administrative fine, if it has established, by regulation, a system for the issuance of citations to a vocational nursing school or program that is consistent with Section 125.9.

(2) In the event that the school or program does not remit the assessed fine within 30 days, the board may place the school or program on provisional approval for up to six
 months or remove it from the approved school or program list and give it written notice of the removal.

(d) A vocational nursing school or program removed from the approved list may apply for approval after 12 months from the date of their removal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 590, Sec. 6.   (AB 3255)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2884.

None of the provisions of this chapter shall be applicable to any school or schools conducted by any well recognized church or denomination for the purpose of training the adherents of such church or denomination in the care of the sick in accordance with its religious tenets.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1689.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Penal Provisions [2885. - 2887.]

2885.

It is unlawful for any person or persons not licensed as provided in this chapter to impersonate in any manner or pretend to be a licensed vocational nurse, or to use the title “Licensed Vocational Nurse,” the letters “L.V.N.,” or any other name, word or symbol in connection with or following the person’s name so as to lead another or others to believe that the person is a licensed vocational nurse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 632, Sec. 29.   (AB 1536)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2886.

(a) It is unlawful for a person to willfully make any false representation or to impersonate any other person in connection with any examination or application for a license, or request to be examined or licensed.

(b) It is unlawful for a person to permit or aid any person in any manner to impersonate that person in connection with any examination or application for a license, or request to be examined or licensed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 3.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2887.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon a conviction thereof shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than 10 days nor more than one year, or by a fine of not less than twenty dollars ($20) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 11.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Revenue [2890. - 2895.5.]

2890.

The Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 759, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2892.

Licenses issued under this chapter prior to January 1, 1974, shall, unless renewed, expire on the last day of the month following the month in 1974 in which the licensee’s birthday occurs and at two-year intervals thereafter on the last day of the month following the month in which the licensee’s birthday occurs. Licenses issued under this chapter on or after January 1, 1974, shall, unless renewed, expire at two-year intervals on the last day of the month following the month in which the licensee’s birthday occurs, beginning with the second birthday following the date on which the license was issued. To renew an unexpired license, the licensee shall, on or before each of the dates on which it would otherwise expire, apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the board and pay the renewal fee prescribed by this chapter.

The board shall give written notice to a licensee 30 days in advance of the renewal date and, 90 days in advance of the expiration of the fourth year that a renewal fee has not been paid, shall give written notice to the licensee informing the licensee in general terms of the provisions of Section 2892.4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

2892.1.

Except as provided in Sections 2892.3 and 2892.5, an expired license may be renewed at any time within four years after its expiration upon filing of an application for renewal on a form prescribed by the board, payment of all accrued and unpaid renewal fees, and payment of any fees due pursuant to Section 2895.1.

If the license is renewed more than 30 days after its expiration, the licensee, as a condition precedent to renewal, shall also pay the delinquency fee prescribed by this chapter. Renewal under this section shall be effective on the date on which the application is filed, on the date on which all renewal fees are paid, or on the date on which the delinquency fee is paid, whichever last occurs. If so renewed, the license shall continue in effect through the date provided in Section 2892 which next occurs after the effective date of the renewal, when it shall expire if it is not again renewed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 435, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2892.2.

A suspended license is subject to expiration and shall be renewed as provided in this article, but such renewal does not entitle the licensee, while the license remains suspended and until it is reinstated, to engage in the licensed activity, or in any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which the license was suspended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 363.)
-------------------------------------------

2892.3.

A revoked license is subject to expiration as provided in this article, but it may not be renewed. If it is reinstated after its expiration, the licensee, as a condition precedent to its reinstatement, shall pay a reinstatement fee in an amount equal to the renewal fee in effect on the date the application for reinstatement is filed, plus the delinquency fee, if any, accrued at the time of its revocation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

2892.4.

A license which is not renewed within four years after its expiration may not be renewed, restored, reissued, or reinstated thereafter, but the holder of the license may apply for and obtain a new license if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) No fact, circumstance, or condition exists which, if the license were issued, would justify its revocation or suspension.

(b) The applicant pays all of the fees that would be required of an applicant for a new license.

(c) The applicant takes and passes the examination which would be required of an applicant for a new license. The examination may be waived in any case in which the applicant establishes to the satisfaction of the board that, with due regard for the public interest, the applicant is qualified to engage in the practice of vocational nursing.

The board may, by appropriate regulation, provide for the waiver or refund of all or any part of the application fee in those cases in which a license is issued without an examination under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 880, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2892.5.

(a) Each person renewing a license under the provisions of this chapter shall submit proof satisfactory to the board that, during the preceding two-year period, the person has kept abreast of developments in the vocational nurse field or in any special area of vocational nurse practice, occurring since the issuance of the certificate, or the last renewal thereof, whichever last occurred, either by pursuing courses of continuing education approved by the board in the vocational nurse field or relevant to the practice of that licensee, and approved by the board; or by other means deemed equivalent by the board.

(b) For purposes of this section, the board shall, by regulation, establish standards for continuing education. The
 standards shall be established in a manner to assure that a variety of alternative forms of continuing education are available to licensees including, but not limited to, academic studies, in-service education, institutes, seminars, lectures, conferences, workshops, extension studies, and home study programs. The standards shall take cognizance of specialized areas of practice. The continuing education standards established by the board shall not exceed 30 hours of direct participation in a course or courses approved by the board, or its equivalent in the units of measure adopted by the board.

(c) This section shall not apply to the first license renewal following the initial issuance of a license.

(d) The board may, in accordance with the intent of this section, make exceptions from continuing education for licensees residing in another state or country, or for reasons of health,
 military service, or other good cause.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 632, Sec. 31.   (AB 1536)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2892.6.

The board shall collect an initial approval fee and a biennial renewal fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) unless a higher fee, not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250), is established by the board, from any provider of a course in continuing education who requests approval by the board of such course for purposes of continuing education requirements under this chapter. That fee, however, shall in no event exceed that cost required for the board to administer the approval of continuing education courses by continuing education providers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 571, Sec. 14.   (SB 1480)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2892.7.

The board shall collect an initial approval and a biennial renewal fee in the amount of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) unless a higher fee, not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250), is established by the board, from any provider of a course in intravenous therapy, blood withdrawal, or intravenous therapy with blood withdrawal, who requests approval by the board of such a course for purposes of intravenous therapy, blood withdrawal, or intravenous therapy with blood withdrawal requirements under this chapter. That fee, however, shall not exceed the regulatory cost required for the board to administer the approval of intravenous therapy, blood withdrawal, or intravenous therapy with blood withdrawal courses by intravenous therapy, blood withdrawal, or intravenous therapy with blood withdrawal
 providers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 571, Sec. 15.   (SB 1480)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2892.8.

(a) The board, upon application and payment of the fee established pursuant to subdivision (h), shall issue a retired license to a licensee if the licensee holds an unrestricted license on the date of application.

(b) An applicant may elect to retire upon renewal or upon submission of an application to the board as required.

(c) A retired licensee shall be exempt from continuing education requirements.

(d) A retired licensee shall utilize their professional title only with the unabbreviated word “retired” directly preceding or directly following the professional title.

(e) A retired licensee shall not be entitled to practice vocational nursing.

(f) The board may investigate potential violations or take action against a retired license for a violation of this chapter.

(g) The board may reinstate a retired license to active status if the retired licensee fulfills the requirements for renewal of a license, including furnishing fingerprints, paying renewal fees, and providing evidence of the following, as applicable:

(1) For a retired licensee who has been retired for four years or fewer, the amount of continuing education required for the renewal of an active license.

(2) For a retired licensee who has been retired for more than four years, either a current valid
 active and clear registered nurse license, vocational nurse license, or an equivalent license in another state, a United States territory, or Canada, or passing the current examination for licensure.

(h) The fee to be paid upon filing the application for a retired license shall be fifty dollars ($50) unless a higher fee, not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100), is established by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 590, Sec. 7.   (AB 3255)   Effective January 1, 2025.)